Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.28.061

Congress—General, primary election laws to apply—Time deadlines, modifications.

The general election laws and laws relating to partisan primaries shall apply to the special primaries and vacancy elections provided for in chapter 29A.28 RCW to the extent that they are not inconsistent with the provisions of these sections. Statutory time deadlines relating to availability of ballots, certification, canvassing, and related procedures that cannot be met in a timely fashion may be modified for the purposes of a specific primary or vacancy election under this chapter by the secretary of state through emergency rules adopted under RCW 29A.04.611.

[ 2013 c 11 s 36; 2011 c 10 s 28; 2004 c 271 s 119.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.